Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Chapter 2. Defense Housing Projects.

§§ 36-56 through 36-64.

Repealed by Acts 2012, c. 437, cl. 1.

Editor’s note.

Former §

36-56

, pertaining to the purpose of Chapter 2, derived from Acts 1942, p. 570. Former § 36-57, pertaining to definitions, was derived from 1942, p. 573; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(34); 1944, p. 146; 1973, c. 401.
Former § 36-58, pertaining to defense housing by housing authorities, derived from 1942, p. 571; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(28); 1944, p. 145. Former
§ 36-59, pertaining to acting for federal government on defense housing, derived from 1942, p. 572; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(29). Former § 36-60, pertaining to cooperation by public bodies on defense housing, derived from 1942, p. 572; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(30); 2006, c. 784. Former
§ 36-61, pertaining to bonds for defense housing as legal investments, derived from 1942, p. 572; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(31). Former § 36-62, pertaining to planning, zoning and building laws, derived from 1942, p. 572; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(32). Former § 36-63, pertaining to making chapter supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law, derived from 1942, p. 574; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(35). Former § 36-64, pertaining to defense housing contracts validated, derived from 1942, p. 573; Michie Code 1942, § 3145(33).